Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 3. Installment Sales, Prohibited Compensation.

§ 29.1-826.
Installment sales.

Every retail installment sale shall be evidenced by an instrument in writing, which shall contain all the agreements of the parties, including a provision stating whether or not such sale is contingent upon financing on terms which are satisfactory to the parties and shall be signed by the buyer. The purchaser of an installment sales contract shall not be charged with notice of the agreement of the parties relative to financing upon the purchase of a retail installment sales contract signed by the borrower which states no such contingency.

Prior to or at the time of delivery of the watercraft the seller shall deliver to the buyer a written statement describing clearly the watercraft sold to the buyer. Whenever any charge for a summary of insurance coverage appears on such statement, and the insurance coverage effected or to be effected thereunder does not include a policy of watercraft liability insurance, the seller or his assignee shall stamp or mark upon the face of such writing in red letters no smaller than eighteen point type the following words: “No Liability Insurance Included.” The Director may determine the form of such statement to be included therein. In the event that a policy of insurance of any kind is purchased at the time of the sale of a watercraft the seller shall deliver to the purchaser the policy of insurance, or a copy of the policy, within a reasonable time.

History.

1988, c. 592.

§ 29.1-827.
Prohibited solicitation and compensation.

It shall be unlawful for any watercraft dealer or salesman licensed under the provisions of this chapter, directly or indirectly, to solicit the sale of a watercraft through a pecuniarily interested person. It shall be unlawful for such dealer or salesman to pay, or cause to be paid, any commission or compensation in any form whatsoever to any person in connection with the sale of a watercraft, unless such person is duly licensed as a salesman in the employ of such dealer.

History.

1988, c. 592.